Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.270

Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings.

A corporation may, at any time prior to the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the secretary of state, revoke the action theretofore taken to dissolve the corporation, in the following manner:

(1) The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the voluntary dissolution proceedings be revoked, and directing that the question of such revocation be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members or shareholders which may be either an annual or a special meeting.

(2) Written or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice by electronic transmission, stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of the meeting is to consider the advisability of revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be given to each member and shareholder within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members or shareholders.

(3) A resolution to revoke voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members and shareholders present in person or by mail or by electronic transmission at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

[ 2000 c 167 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 54.]